California statutes. Labor Code
(b) Before March 1, 2003, the division shall establish an application procedure and all requirements for a permit under this section, which shall include the following:

(1) At a minimum, the applicant for a permit under this section shall meet all of the following requirements:

(A) The applicant shall hold a current elevator contractor’s license issued pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) The applicant shall be a certified qualified conveyance company.

(C) The applicant shall submit proof of the following types of insurance coverage, in the form of certified copies of policies or certificates of
 insurance:

(i) Liability insurance to provide general liability coverage of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the injury or death of any one person or persons in any one occurrence, with coverage of not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for property damage in any one occurrence.

(ii) Workers’ compensation insurance coverage.

(D) In the event of any material alteration, nonrenewal, or cancellation of any insurance required by this subparagraph, the applicant or permitholder shall submit written notice thereof to the division within five working days.

(2) At a minimum, each application for a permit under this section shall include all of the following:

(A) Copies of specifications and accurately scaled and fully dimensioned plans showing the location of the installation in relation to the plans and elevation of the building; the location of the machinery room and the equipment to be installed, relocated, or altered; and all structural supporting members thereof, including foundations. The plans and specifications shall identify all materials to be employed and all loads to be supported or conveyed. The plans and specifications shall be sufficiently complete to illustrate all details of construction and design.

(B) The name, residence, and business address of the applicant and each partner, or for a corporation, the principal officers and anyone who is authorized to accept service of process or official notices; the number of years the applicant has engaged in the business of constructing, erecting, installing, or altering conveyances; and the approximate number of persons to be
 employed on the permitted job.

(C) The permit fee.

(3) The division shall establish, and may from time to time amend, a fee for a permit under this section in an amount sufficient to defray the division’s actual costs in administering the permit process, including the costs of investigation, revocation, or other associated costs. Permit fees collected by the division are nonrefundable.

(c) (1) The permit shall expire when the work authorized by that permit is not commenced within six months after the date of issuance, or within a shorter period as the division may specify at the time the permit is issued.

(2) The permit shall expire following commencement of work, if the permitholder suspends or abandons the work for a period of 60
 days, or for a shorter period of time as the division may specify at the time the permit is issued.

(3) Upon application and for good cause shown, the division may extend a permit that would otherwise expire under this subdivision.

(d) The division may revoke any permit at any time, upon good cause, and after notice and an opportunity to be heard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 503, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7301.5.

(a) The standards board shall adopt regulations pertaining to conveyances, including, but not limited to, conveyance emergency and signal devices, and the operation of conveyances under fire and other emergency conditions.

(b) Before January 1, 2003, the division shall establish an application procedure and all requirements for certification under this subdivision as an emergency certified competent conveyance mechanic. To ensure the safety of the public when a disaster or other
 emergency exists within the state and the number of certified competent conveyance mechanics in the state is insufficient to cope with the emergency, any certified qualified conveyance company may, within five business days after commencing work requiring certified competent conveyance mechanics, apply to the division, on behalf of all persons performing the work who are not certified competent conveyance mechanics, for certification as emergency certified competent conveyance mechanics. Any person for whom emergency certification is sought under this subdivision shall be certified by a certified qualified conveyance company to have an acceptable combination of documented experience and education to perform work covered by this chapter without direct and immediate supervision. The certified qualified conveyance company shall furnish proof of competency as the division may require. The division shall issue an emergency certified competent conveyance mechanic certificate upon receipt of acceptable
 documentation and payment of the required fee. Each certificate issued pursuant to this subdivision shall recite that it is valid for a period of 30 days from the date of issuance and for those particular conveyances and geographical areas as the division may designate, and otherwise shall entitle the person being certified to the rights and privileges of a certified competent conveyance mechanic as set forth in this chapter. The division shall renew an emergency certified competent conveyance mechanic certificate during the existence of the emergency.

(c) Before January 1, 2004, the division shall establish an application procedure and all requirements for certification under this subdivision as a temporary certified competent conveyance mechanic. If there are no certified qualified conveyance mechanics available to perform elevator work, a certified qualified conveyance company may apply to the division for certification of one or more
 temporary certified competent conveyance mechanics. Any person seeking to work as a temporary certified competent conveyance mechanic shall, before beginning work, be approved by the division as having an acceptable combination of documented experience and education to perform work covered by this chapter without direct and immediate supervision. The certified qualified conveyance company shall furnish proof of competency as the division may require. The division may issue a temporary certified competent conveyance mechanic certificate upon acceptable documentation and payment of the required fee. Each certificate issued pursuant to this subdivision shall recite that it is valid for a period of 30 days from the date of issuance and while the certificate holder is employed by the certified qualified conveyance company that certified the individual as competent. The certificate shall be renewable as long as the shortage of certified competent conveyance mechanics continues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 503, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7302.

The operation of a conveyance without a permit by any person owning or having the custody, management, or control of the operation of the conveyance, is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 10 days, or by both that fine and imprisonment. Each day of operation for each conveyance without a permit is a separate offense. Any person who has requested the issuance or renewal of a permit if the request has not been acted upon by the division may not be prosecuted for a
 violation of this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7302.1.

(a) Any person who contracts for or authorizes the erection, construction, installation, or material alteration of a conveyance without a permit in violation of Section 7301.1 is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seventy thousand dollars ($70,000), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Any employer or contractor who contracts for or engages in the erection, construction, installation, or
 material alteration of a conveyance without a permit in violation of Section 7301.1 is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seventy thousand dollars ($70,000), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7302.2.

The division may assess a civil penalty of not more than seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) against any person, and against any employer or contractor, who contracts for or authorizes the erection, construction, installation, or material alteration of a conveyance without a permit issued pursuant to Section 7301.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7303.

(a) Whenever any conveyance is operated without a current valid permit issued pursuant to Section 7304, and is in a condition that its use is dangerous to the life or safety of any person, the division or any affected person may apply to the superior court of the county in which the conveyance is located for an injunction restraining the operation of the conveyance until the condition is corrected. Proof by certification of the division that a permit has not been issued, has expired, or has been revoked, together with the affidavit of any
 safety inspector of the division or other expert that the operation of the conveyance is dangerous to the life or safety of any person, is sufficient ground, in the discretion of the court, for the immediate granting of a temporary restraining order.

(b) No bond shall be required from the division as a prerequisite for the division to seek or obtain any restraining order under subdivision (a).

(c) Any person who intentionally violates any injunction prohibiting the operation of the conveyance issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be liable for a civil penalty, to be assessed by the division, not to exceed seven thousand dollars ($7,000) for each violation. Each day of operation for each conveyance is a separate violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7304.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the division shall cause all conveyances to be inspected at least once each year. If a conveyance is found upon inspection to be in a safe condition for operation, a permit for operation for not longer than one year shall be issued by the division.

(b) If a conveyance is subject to a full maintenance service contract, the division may, after investigation and inspection, issue a permit for operation for not longer than two
 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 265.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7305.

If inspection shows that a conveyance is in an unsafe condition, the division may issue a preliminary order requiring repairs or alterations to be made to the conveyance that are necessary to render it safe, and may prohibit its operation or use until the repairs or alterations are made or the unsafe conditions are removed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7306.

Unless the preliminary order is complied with, a hearing before the division shall be allowed, upon request, at which the owner, operator, or other person in charge of the conveyance may appear and show cause why he or she should not comply with the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7307.

(a) If it thereafter appears to the division that the conveyance is unsafe and that the requirements contained in the preliminary order should be complied with, or that other things should be done to make the conveyance safe, the division may order or confirm the withholding of the permit and may impose requirements as it deems proper for the repair or alteration of the conveyance or for the correction of the unsafe condition. The order may thereafter be reheard by the division or reviewed by the courts in the manner specified for safety
 orders by Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of this division, and not otherwise.

(b) The operation of a conveyance by any person owning or having the custody, management, or control of the operation thereof, while an order to repair is outstanding pursuant to subdivision (a), is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven thousand dollars ($7,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 30 days, or by both that fine and imprisonment. Each day of operation for each conveyance without a permit is a separate offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7308.

If the operation of a conveyance during the making of repairs or alterations is not immediately dangerous to the safety of persons, the division may issue a temporary permit for its operation for a period not to exceed 30 days during the making of repairs or alterations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7309.

The division may cause the inspection herein provided for to be made either by its safety inspectors or by any qualified elevator inspector employed by an insurance company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

7309.1.

(a) On and after June 30, 2003, no conveyance subject to this chapter shall be reinspected by any person unless the person is a conveyance inspector employed by the division or certified as qualified by the division.

(b) Before March 1, 2003, the division shall establish an application procedure and all requirements for the certification of conveyance inspectors. Each application for certification shall include information as the division may require and the applicable fee. At a
 minimum, the applicant shall present proof of certification as a qualified conveyance inspector by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers or proof of education and experience equivalent to what is required to obtain that certification from the American Society of Mechanical Engineers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 503, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7310.

The division may also issue its permit or a permit may be issued on its behalf based upon a certificate of inspection issued by a conveyance inspector of any municipality, upon proof to the satisfaction of the division that the safety requirements of the municipality are equal to the minimum safety requirements for conveyances adopted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 503, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7311.

All persons inspecting conveyances shall first secure from the division a certificate of competency to make those inspections. The division may determine the competency of any applicant for the certificate, either by examination or by other satisfactory proof of qualifications. The division may rescind at any time, upon good cause being shown therefor, and after hearing, if requested, any certificate of competency issued by it to a conveyance inspector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 503, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7311.1.

(a) On and after June 30, 2003, no conveyance subject to this chapter shall be erected, constructed, installed, materially altered, tested, maintained, repaired, or serviced by any person, firm, or corporation unless the person, firm, or corporation is certified by the division as a certified qualified conveyance company. A copy of the certificate shall be kept at the site of the conveyance at all times
 while any work is in progress, and shall be made available for inspection upon request. However, certification under this section is not required for removing or dismantling conveyances that are destroyed as a result of the complete demolition of a secured building or structure or where the hoistway or wellway is demolished back to the basic support structure and no access is permitted that would endanger the safety of any person. This section does not apply to platform lifts and stairway chairlifts installed in a private residence as provided in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 7317.

(b) Before March 1, 2003, the division shall establish an application procedure and all requirements for certification under this section as a certified qualified conveyance company, consistent with this section. At a minimum, the individual qualifying on behalf of a corporation, the owner on behalf of a sole ownership, or the partners on behalf
 of a partnership, shall meet either of the following requirements:

(1) Five years’ work experience at a journeyperson level in the conveyance industry in construction, installation, alteration, testing, maintenance, and service and repair of conveyances covered by this chapter. This experience shall be verified by current and previously licensed elevator contractors or by current and previously certified qualified conveyance companies.

(2) Satisfactory completion of a written examination administered by the division on the most recent applicable codes and standards.

(c) At a minimum, each application for certification as a certified qualified conveyance company shall include:

(1) The name, residence and business address, and telephone numbers and other
 means to contact the sole owner or each partner, or for a corporation of the principal officers and the individual qualifying for the corporation; the number of years the applicant business has engaged in the business of constructing, maintaining, and service and repair of conveyances; and other information as the division may require.

(2) The fee required by this chapter.

(d) Before bidding for or engaging in any work covered by this chapter, a certified qualified conveyance company shall submit proof to the division by certified copies of policies or certificates of insurance, of all of the following:

(1) Liability insurance providing general liability coverage of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for injury or death of any one person or persons in any one occurrence, with coverage of not less than
 five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for property damage of any one person or persons in any one occurrence.

(2) Workers’ compensation insurance coverage.

(3) In the event of any material alteration or cancellation of any policy specified in paragraph (1) or (2), the certified qualified conveyance company shall provide written notice thereof to the division within five working days.

(e) An elevator company subject to this chapter shall disclose its status as a certified qualified conveyance company prior to bidding on a project or prior to contracting for services. The disclosure shall be in writing and located in a conspicuous place on the bid documents or contract in at least 10-point type.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 196, Sec. 1.   (SB 478)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7311.2.

(a) On and after June 30, 2003, except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 7301.5, any person who, without supervision, erects, constructs, installs, alters, tests, maintains, services or repairs, removes, or dismantles any conveyance covered by this chapter, shall be certified as a certified competent conveyance mechanic by the division. This section does not apply to platform lifts and stairway chairlifts installed in a private residence as provided in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 7317.

(b) Before March 1, 2003, the division shall establish an application procedure and all requirements for certification under this section as a certified competent conveyance mechanic, consistent with all of the following:

(1) At a minimum, a certified competent conveyance mechanic applicant shall meet both of the following requirements:

(A) Three years’ work experience in the conveyance industry in construction, maintenance, and service and repair of conveyances covered by this chapter. This experience shall be verified by current and previously licensed elevator contractors or by current and previously certified qualified conveyance companies, as required by the division.

(B) One of the following:

(i) Satisfactory completion of a written examination administered by the division on the most recent applicable codes and standards.

(ii) A certificate of completion and successfully passing the mechanic examination of a nationally recognized training program for the conveyance industry, such as the National Elevator Industry Educational Program or its equivalent.

(iii) A certificate of completion of an apprenticeship program for elevator mechanic, having standards substantially equal to those of this chapter, and which program shall be registered with the Bureau of Apprenticeship and Training of the United States Department of Labor or a state apprenticeship council.

(iv) A certificate or license from another state having standards substantially equal to or more comprehensive than those of this
 chapter.

(v) The applicant applies on or before December 31, 2003, and within the three years immediately prior to January 1, 2003, has documented at least three years of actual work experience in the conveyance industry in construction, maintenance, and service and repair of conveyances covered by this chapter. This experience shall be as a journey-level mechanic working without direct and immediate supervision, and shall be verified by currently and previously licensed conveyance contractors or by current and previously certified qualified conveyance companies, as required by the division.

(2) At a minimum, each application for certification as a certified competent conveyance mechanic shall include the information required by the division and the fee required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 503, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7311.25.

(a) The following meanings apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Agricultural production, processing, and handling facilities” includes grain elevators, feed mills, flour mills, rice mills, rice dryers, and other similar facilities.

(2) “Applicable Elevator Safety Orders” means the Elevator Safety Orders referenced in Subchapter 6
 (commencing with Section 3000) of Chapter 4 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, and any successors to those orders.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7311.2 or any other provision of this chapter, an owner or operator of agricultural production, processing, and handling facilities may designate a competent person in his or her employ to maintain, repair, service, lubricate, or test manlifts installed and used at the facilities if the manlifts are maintained and inspected in accordance with applicable Elevator Safety Orders. The designated competent person need not be a certified competent conveyance mechanic.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 196, Sec. 2.   (SB 478)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7311.3.

(a) A certificate issued by the division to the certified qualified conveyance inspector, certified qualified conveyance company, or certified competent conveyance mechanic as set forth in Sections 7309.1, 7311.1, and 7311.2, shall have a term of two years. The fee for biennial renewal shall be established by the division in an amount sufficient to defray the division’s costs of administering this chapter.

(b) The renewal of all certificates issued under this chapter shall be
 conditioned upon the submission of a certificate of completion of a course designed to ensure the continuing education of certificate holders on new and existing provisions of the regulations of the board. This continuing education course shall consist of not less than eight hours of instruction that shall be attended and completed within one year immediately preceding any certificate renewal.

(c) The courses shall be taught by instructors through continuing education providers that may include, but not be limited to, division programs, association seminars, and joint labor-management apprenticeship and journeyman upgrade training programs. The division shall approve the continuing education providers and curriculum. All instructors shall be approved by the division and shall be exempt from the requirements of subdivision (b), provided that the applicant is qualified as an instructor at any time during the one-year period immediately preceding
 the scheduled date for renewal.

(d) A certificate holder who is unable to complete the continuing education course required under this section prior to the expiration of his or her certificate due to a temporary disability may apply for a waiver from the division. Waiver applications shall be submitted to the division on a form provided by the division. Waiver applications shall be signed and accompanied by a declaration signed by a competent physician attesting to the applicant’s temporary disability. Upon the termination of the temporary disability, the certificate holder shall submit to the division a declaration from the same physician, if practicable, attesting to the termination of the temporary disability, and a waiver sticker, valid for 90 days, shall be issued to the certificate holder and affixed to his or her certificate.

(e) Continuing education providers approved by
 the division shall keep uniform records, for a period of 10 years, of attendance of certificate holders, following a format approved by the division. These records shall be available for inspection by the division at its request. Approved continuing education providers shall keep secure all attendance records and certificates of completion. Falsifying or knowingly allowing another to falsify attendance records or certificates of completion of continuing education provided pursuant to this section shall constitute grounds for suspension or revocation of the approval required under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 503, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7311.4.

(a) The division shall establish fees for initial and renewal applications for certification under this chapter as a certified qualified conveyance inspector, certified qualified conveyance company, or certified competent conveyance mechanic based upon the costs to the division of administering the certification and licensing program in this chapter, including the cost of developing and administering any tests as well as any costs related to continuing education, investigation, revocation, or other associated costs. In fixing the amount of these fees, the division may include direct costs and a reasonable percentage attributable to the indirect costs of the division for administering this chapter.

(b) Fees collected pursuant to this chapter are nonrefundable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 196.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7311.5.

(a) A person, firm, or corporation that maintains and repairs solely special purpose personnel elevators on cranes that utilize a rack and pinion system in marine terminals as part of crane maintenance activities qualifies as a certified qualified conveyance company under Section 7311.1 if the individual qualifying individually or on behalf of the firm or corporation has five years’ work experience at a journeyperson level in the crane maintenance industry, including experience in the maintenance and repair of crane elevators. This experience
 shall be verified by a person, firm, or corporation in the business of maintaining and repairing cranes in marine terminals.

(b) A person qualifies as a certified competent conveyance mechanic under Section 7311.2 if the person has three years’ work experience in the crane maintenance industry, including experience in the maintenance and repair of crane elevators, as a journey-level mechanic without direct and immediate supervision. This experience shall be verified by a crane maintenance company approved as a certified qualified conveyance company pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The certifications obtained pursuant to this section may only be used for the limited purposes of maintaining and repairing special purpose personnel elevators on cranes that utilize a rack and pinion system in marine terminals.

(d) A
 person, firm, or corporation that qualifies for certification as a certified qualified conveyance company or certified competent conveyance mechanic is not authorized to perform any of the following procedures:

(1) Any work on a conveyance other than a special purpose personnel elevator on cranes that utilize a rack and pinion system in marine terminals.

(2) Any work related to new elevator installations.

(3) Any modifications or alterations of existing elevator systems.

(4) Testing or replacing of emergency brakes, centrifugal brakes, emergency safety devices, or electrical systems.

(5) Annual certifications of any type of conveyance or elevator.

(e) The certifications authorized by this section require experience but do not require an examination because the general examination given pursuant to this chapter is inapplicable to the work described in this section. The division is not required to set up specialty examinations to certify persons pursuant to this chapter.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Special purpose personnel elevators” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 3085 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) “Marine terminal” shall have the same meaning as used in Section 3460 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(g) Nothing in
 this section exempts a person, firm, or corporation applying for certification as a certified qualified conveyance company or a certified competent conveyance mechanic under this section from paying the administration fees required under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 448, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7312.

The division may at any time, upon good cause being shown therefor, and after notice and an opportunity to be heard, revoke any permit to operate a conveyance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7313.

Each conveyance inspector shall, within 21 days after he or she makes an inspection, forward to the division on forms provided by it, a report of the inspection. Failure to comply with this section shall be grounds for the division to cancel his or her certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 503, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7314.

(a) The division shall, subject to subdivision (f), fix and collect fees for the inspection of conveyances as it determines to be necessary to cover the costs to the division of administering the inspection and permitting programs in this chapter, including fees for necessary subsequent inspections to determine if applicable safety orders have been complied with and for field consultations. In fixing the amount of these fees, the division may include direct costs and a reasonable percentage attributable to the indirect costs of the division for administering this chapter, including the costs related to regulatory development as required by Section 7323.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 6103 of the Government Code, the division
 may collect the fees authorized by subdivision (a) from the state or any county, city, district, or other political subdivision.

(c) Whenever a person owning or having the custody, management, or operation of a conveyance fails to pay the fees required under this chapter within 60 days after the date of notification, he or she shall pay, in addition to the fees required under this chapter, a penalty fee equal to 100 percent of the fee. Failure to pay fees within 60 days after the date of notification constitutes cause for the division to prohibit use of the conveyance.

(d) (1) Any fees required pursuant to this section shall, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), be set forth in regulations that shall be adopted as emergency regulations. These emergency regulations shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law
 pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). These regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(2) A suspension or reduction of fees pursuant to subdivision (f) is not required to be set forth in a regulation.

(e) For purposes of this section, the date of the invoice assessing a fee pursuant to this section shall be considered the date of notification.

(f) (1) For the 2015–16 fiscal year, the fees for the annual and biennial inspection of conveyances required by Section 7304 are suspended on a one-time basis.

(2) For the 2016–17 fiscal year, and for every fiscal year thereafter, the
 Director of Industrial Relations, upon concurrence of the Department of Finance, may suspend or reduce the fees for the annual and biennial inspections of conveyances required by Section 7304 on a one-time basis for that fiscal year in order to reduce the amount of moneys in the Elevator Safety Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 197.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7315.

Fees shall be paid before the issuance of any permit to operate a conveyance, but a temporary permit may be issued pending receipt of fee payment. The division shall not charge an inspection fee if an inspection has been made by an inspector of an insurance company or municipality who holds a certificate as a conveyance inspector and an inspection report is filed with the division within 21 days after inspection is made. The division may charge a fee for processing and issuing the permit to operate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 198.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7316.

All fees collected by the division under this chapter shall be paid into the Elevator Safety Account which is hereby created for the administration of the division’s conveyance safety program. The division shall establish criteria upon which fee charges are based and prepare an annual report concerning revenues obtained and expenditures appropriated for the conveyance safety program. The division shall file the report with the Legislative Analyst, the Joint Legislative Audit Committee, and the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 503, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7317.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the following conveyances are exempt from this chapter:

(1) Conveyances under the jurisdiction of the United States government.

(2) Conveyances located in a single-unit private home and not accessible to the public.

(3) Conveyances located in a multiunit residential building serving no more than two dwelling
 units and not accessible to the public.

(b) Conveyances otherwise exempted pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be inspected by the division upon completion of installation prior to being placed in service or after major alterations. The inspection shall be for safety and compliance with orders or regulations applicable to the type of conveyance installed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7318.

Nothing in this chapter limits the authority of the division to prescribe or enforce general or special safety orders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7319.

All elevators used for the carriage of passengers shall be provided with a suitable seat for the operator in charge. Failure to comply with this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50) for each offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 224.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

7320.

The division may assess a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) against any person owning or having custody, management, or control of the operation of a conveyance, who operates the conveyance without a permit or who fails to conspicuously post the permit in the conveyance. No penalty shall be assessed against any person who has requested the issuance or renewal of a permit and the request has not been acted upon by the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7321.

(a) The division may assess a civil penalty not to exceed seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) against any person owning or having custody, management, or control of the operation of a conveyance, who operates or permits the operation of the conveyance in a condition that is dangerous to the life or safety of any person, or who operates or permits the operation of the conveyance in violation of an order prohibiting use issued pursuant to Section 7301, 7305, or 7314.

(b) The
 division shall issue an order prohibiting use and may assess a civil penalty not to exceed seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) against any person who constructs, installs, or materially alters a conveyance without a permit issued pursuant to Section 7301.1 that is dangerous to the life or safety of any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7321.5.

The division shall enforce Sections 7320 and 7321 by issuance of a citation and notice of civil penalty in a manner consistent with Sections 6317 and 6319. Any person owning or having custody, management, or control of the operation of a conveyance who receives a citation and notice of civil penalty may appeal to the Occupational Safety and Health Appeals Board in a manner consistent with Section 6319.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7322.

(a) Once an authorized representative of the division has issued an order prohibiting the use of a conveyance as specified in Sections 7301, 7305, 7314, or subdivision (b) of Section 7321, the person owning or having custody, management, or operation of the conveyance may contest the order and shall be granted, upon request, a hearing to review the validity of the order. The hearing shall be held no later than 10 working days following receipt of the request for hearing.
